Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1141.1, as
last amended by Section 20, Chapter 330, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1141.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1141.1. A. Each licensed operator shall be entitled to
retain the following amounts from the taxes and fees collected by
such licensed operator to be used to fund the operation of the
office of such licensed operator subject to the provisions of
Sections 1140 through 1147 of this title:
1. Beginning July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2023, Three Dollars
and fifty-six cents ($3.56) for each vehicle registered pursuant to
the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act;
Req. No. 15302 Page 1

2. Beginning on or after January 1, 2022, through June 30,
2023, if a special or personalized license plate is issued pursuant
to Sections 1135.1 through 1135.7 of this title and remittance is
combined with the registration required pursuant to Section 1132 of
this title, Seven Dollars and twelve cents ($7.12). Beginning July
1, 2023, through June 30, 2025, Three Dollars and fifty-six cents
($3.56) for each special license plate issued pursuant to Sections
1135.1 through Section 1135.7 of this title;
3. One Dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) for each
certificate of title issued for boats and motors pursuant to the
Oklahoma Statutes;
4. For each certificate of registration issued for boats and
motors pursuant to the Oklahoma Statutes, an amount determined
pursuant to the provisions of subsection B of this section;
5. Two Dollars and twenty-five cents ($2.25) Three Dollars and
seventy-five cents ($3.75) for each certificate of title issued
pursuant to the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act.
Provided, the fee retention amount for certificates of title issued
pursuant to the provisions of subsection H of Section 1105 of this
title, in which an insurer pays the optional twenty-two-dollar-fee
amount, is Four Dollars and fifty cents ($4.50);
6. Beginning July 1, 2002, through June 30, 2023, each licensed
operator shall be entitled to retain three and twenty-five one-

Req. No. 15302 Page 2

hund redths percent (3.25%) of the vehicle excise tax collected
pursuant to Section 2103 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Four percent (4%) of the excise tax collected on the
transfer of boats and motors pursuant to the Oklahoma Statutes
through June 30, 2025;
8. Two Dollars ($2.00) for each driver license, endorsement,
identification license, or renewal or duplicate issued pursuant to
Section 6-101 et seq. of this title through June 30, 2023;
9. Two Dollars ($2.00) for the recording of security interests
as provided in Section 1110 of this title;
10. Two Dollars ($2.00) for each inspection conducted pursuant
to subsection L of Section 1105 of this title;
11. Three Dollars ($3.00) for each inspection conducted
pursuant to subsection M of Section 1105 of this title;
12. One Dollar ($1.00) for each certificate of ownership filed
pursuant to subsection R of Section 1105 of this title;
13. One Dollar ($1.00) for each temporary permit issued
pursuant to Section 1124 of this title;
14. One Dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for processing each
proof of financial responsibility, driver license information,
insurance verification information, and other additional information
as provided in Section 7-602 of this title;
15. The mailing fees and registration fees provided in Sections
1131 and 1140 of this title;
Req. No. 15302 Page 3

16. The notary fee provided in Section 1143 of this title;
17. Three Dollars ($3.00) for each lien entry form completed
and recorded on a certificate of title pursuant to subsection G of
Section 1105 of this title;
18. Seven Dollars ($7.00) for each notice of transfer as
provided by subsection B of Section 1107.4 of this title;
19. Seven Dollars ($7.00) for each certificate of title or each
certificate of registration issued for repossessed vehicles pursuant
to Section 1126 of this title;
20. Any amount specifically authorized by law to be retained by
the licensed operator for the furnishing of a summary of a traffic
record;
21. Beginning July 1, 2009, and through June 30, 2023, each
licensed operator shall also be entitled to a portion of the
penalties for delinquent registration or payment of excise tax as
provided for in subsection C of Section 1115, subsection F of
Section 1132 and subsection C of Section 1151 of this title and of
subsection A of Section 2103 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. Beginning January 1, 2023, each licensed operator shall be
entitled to retain Three Dollars and fifty-six cents ($3.56) for
each electric vehicle registered pursuant to the provisions of this
act and such amount shall be in addition to any other amount
otherwise authorized by this section to be retained with respect to
a vehicle through June 30, 2025;
Req. No. 15302 Page 4

23. Beginning January 1, 2023, and through June 30, 2023, each
licensed operator shall be entitled to retain three and twenty-five
hundredths percent (3.25%) of the vehicle excise tax collected
pursuant to Section 2103 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes for
each electric vehicle but such amount shall not be in addition to
any other amount otherwise authorized by this section to be retained
with respect to a vehicle; and
24. Upon the effective date of this act, Service Oklahoma is
authorized to set the licensed operator compensation pursuant to
Section 3-103 of this title for processing the documentation
submitted and issuing the license plate and/or decal pursuant to
this subsection.
The balance of the funds collected shall be remitted to Service
Oklahoma as provided in Section 1142 of this title to be apportioned
pursuant to Section 1104 of this title.
B. Through June 30, 2025, for each certificate of registration
issued for boats and motors, each licensed operator shall be
entitled to retain the greater of One Dollar and twenty-five cents
($1.25) or an amount to be determined by Service Oklahoma according
to the provisions of this subsection. At the end of fiscal year
1997 and each fiscal year thereafter, Service Oklahoma shall compute
the average amount of registration fees for all boats and motors
registered in this state during the fiscal year and shall multiply
the result by six and twenty-two one-hundredths percent (6.22%).
Req. No. 15302 Page 5

The resulting product shall be the amount which may be retained by
each licensed operator for each certificate of registration for
boats and motors issued during the following calendar year.
C. When an application for registration is made with Service
Oklahoma, the Corporation Commission or a licensed operator, a
registration fee of One Dollar and seventy-five cents ($1.75) shall
be collected for each license plate or decal issued. Such fees
shall be in addition to the registration fees on motor vehicles and
when an application for registration is made to the licensed
operator, such licensed operator shall retain a fee as provided in
Section 1141.1 of this title through June 30, 2023. Beginning July
1, 2023, the fee shall be retained by the licensed operator pursuant
to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this title. When the fee is
paid by a person making application directly with Service Oklahoma
or the Corporation Commission, as applicable, the registration fees
shall be in the same amount as provided for licensed operators and
the fee provided by this section shall be deposited in the Service
Oklahoma Revolving Fund or as provided in Section 1167 of this
title, as applicable. Service Oklahoma shall prepare schedules of
registration fees and charges for titles, which shall include the
fees for licensed operators, and all fees and charges paid by a
person shall be listed separately on the application and
registration and totaled on the application and registration. The
licensed operators shall charge only such fees as are specifically
Req. No. 15302 Page 6

prov ided for by law, and all such authorized fees shall be posted in
such a manner that any person shall have notice of all fees that are
imposed by law.
D. Unless otherwise provided, beginning July 1, 2025, the
provisions related to the reimbursement, retention, apportionment,
or distribution of funds to or by licensed operators as outlined in
this section shall be retained by the licensed operator pursuant to
subsection E of this section.
E. Beginning July 1, 2023, unless otherwise provided, licensed
operator compensation shall be fixed by Service Oklahoma pursuant to
Section 3-103 of this title.
1. For fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023, through the fiscal
year ending on June 30, 2025:
a. licensed operators shall be entitled to retain
nineteen percent (19%) of all fees collected related
to registrations provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle
License and Registration Act,
b. licensed operators shall be entitled to retain forty
percent (40%) of all fees collected related to the
issuance of Class A, Class B, Class C, and Class D
driver licenses, permits, and identification cards,
including REAL ID Compliant and REAL ID Noncompliant
credentials, pursuant to Section 6-101 et seq. of this
title, and
Req. No. 15302 Page 7

c. licensed operators shall be entitled to retain Three
Dollars and fifty-six cents ($3.56) for the annual
renewal of each frac tank, construction machinery,
rental trailer, commercial trailer or semitrailer
registered pursuant to Section 1133 of this title.
2. All other fees directed by this section shall default back
to the apportionment outlined in Section 1104 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15302 JBH 12/30/25














Req. No. 15302 Page 8